District of Columbia statutes.
16-4603.09

Service of petition and order.

Except as otherwise provided in §§ 16-306 (adoptions), 16-2306 (neglect proceedings), 16-2357 (termination of parental rights), and 16-4603.11 (custody under emergency circumstances), the petition and order must be served upon respondent and any person who has physical custody of the child by any method authorized for the service of complaints under the rules for domestic relations proceedings adopted by the Board of Judges of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-293, § 2(d), 48 DCR 2214
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 309 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act (1997 Act).